Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS chapter 279C.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Manufactured product” means a preassembled item that is made of iron or steel and
that a contractor brings to a construction project for incorporation into  a public improve-
ment or public works  or a preassembled item that is made of iron or steel and that the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services or the Department of Transportation ac-
quires for a public use.
(b) “Produced in the United States” means:
(A) For iron and steel products, other  than manufactured products, that all manufac-
turing processes, from the initial melting stage through the application  of coatings, occurred
within the United States; and
(B) For manufactured products, that:
(i) The manufacture of the product occurred within the United States; and
(ii) The cost of the components of the product  that are mined, produced or manufactured
in the United States is more than 55 percent of the total cost of all components  of the
product, unless either department by rule establishes a different standard  for determining
the minimum amount of the product that must be manufactured within the United States.
(2)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  and the Department of Trans-
portation shall require  in each public improvement contract or contract for public works
with an estimated  contract price of $250,000 or more that steel, iron, coatings for steel and
iron and manufactured products that a contractor purchases  for or uses in the public im-
provement or public works, and that  become part of a permanent structure, must be
produced in the United States.
(b) Each department shall, in  all solicitation documents for any procurement related to
the public improvement contract or contract for public works, note clearly and conspicuously
that any public improvement  contract or contract for public works that results from the
procurement will include the  requirement set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection. Each
department shall reject any bid or proposal that does not affirmatively attest that the  bidder
or proposer read and understood the requirement.
Enrolled House Bill 3332 (HB 3332-B) Page 1
(c)(A) The requirement set forth  in paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply if the
Director of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services or the Director of Transpor-
tation, or either director’s designee, finds in writing that:
(i) The requirement is inconsistent with the public interest;
(ii) Steel, iron, coatings for steel  and iron and manufactured products required for the
public improvement or public works are not produced in the United States in sufficient and
reasonably available quantities and with satisfactory quality; or
(iii) Using steel,  iron, coatings for steel and iron or manufactured products produced in
the United States for  the public improvement or the public works will increase the cost of
the public improvement or public works by more than 25 percent.
(B) Before making  a finding under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the Director of
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services or the Director of Transportation, as
appropriate, shall issue a draft finding that includes a detailed written explanation  of the
basis for waiving the requirement set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection. At  the ear-
liest practicable time, the director shall give public notice of  the draft finding in a manner
that the director determines  will give adequate notice to the public and to contractors that
intend to submit, or have submitted,  bids or proposals for the public improvement or public
works. The director shall allow  seven calendar days for public comment on the draft finding.
If after considering public comment the director determines to waive the requirement set
forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director shall provide public notice of  the
director’s finding using the  same method the director used to provide public notice of the
draft finding.
(C) The director shall  respond within 15 days to a request for a finding described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph by:
(i) Issuing the draft finding described in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph; or
(ii) Asking the person that submitted  the request to provide any additional information
the director requires to make the draft finding.
(d) The director may make a finding under paragraph (c) of this subsection  that applies
to a single public improvement contract or contract for public works, to a class of  public
improvement contracts or contracts for public works or to a class of iron or  steel products,
coatings or manufactured  products. The director shall indicate the duration and applicability
of the director’s finding in the document in which the director waives  the requirement set
forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(e) The director may review  and continue, amend or rescind the director’s finding at any
time. If the director waives  the requirement set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection for
a class of public improvement contracts or contracts for  public works or for a class of iron
or steel products, coatings or manufactured products, at least every five years  the director
shall review and, if necessary, amend or rescind  the waiver. Before continuing, amending
or rescinding a waiver under this paragraph, the director shall provide for public notice and
comment in accordance with paragraph (c)(B) of this subsection.
(f) The Director of the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services may delegate the
director’s duties under paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection to the head  of a state con-
tracting agency that enters into a  public improvement contract or contract for public works
under authority delegated from the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(3)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services by rule shall establish a tech-
nical assistance and grant program to enable enterprises and businesses certified under ORS
200.055 to become familiar with and meet the obligations set forth in this section.
(b) Before  establishing the program described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
department shall submit to the Legislative  Assembly a request for funding in an amount the
department estimates would be necessary  to administer the program and provide grants. The
department shall deposit  any moneys the department receives as funding into a designated
Enrolled House Bill 3332 (HB 3332-B) Page 2
account within the department’s operating account and  shall keep a record of the amount
and purpose of each disbursement from the account.
(c) A recipient of moneys from the department may not use the moneys  to defray ex-
penses the recipient incurs to prepare  a bid or proposal in response to a procurement for a
public improvement or public works.
(4) The requirements set forth in this  section are subject to applicable state and federal
trade agreements.
SECTION 3. (1) Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5040), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received as reimbursement from the United States Department of Transportation,  but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5040), collected or received by the Department of Transportation,
for project delivery and support, is increased by $215,287.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from
fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received
from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section  2,
chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), collected or received by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for enterprise goods  and services, is in-
creased by $215,287.
SECTION 4.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act applies  to procurements that the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services or the Department of Transportation advertises or solicits
or, if neither department advertises or solicits  the procurement, to public improvement
contracts or contracts for public works into which either department enters on or after  the
operative date specified in section 5 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) Section 2 of this 2023 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Director  of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and the Director
of Transportation may adopt rules and take any other  action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable  the directors to under-
take and exercise all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the directors by  sec-
tion 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3332 (HB 3332-B) Page 3
Passed by House June 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3332 (HB 3332-B) Page 4